California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
 state, sufficient to pay the principal and interest on these bonds as provided herein, and all officers required by law to perform any duty in regard to the collection of state revenues shall collect this additional sum.

On the dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal and interest of the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned into the General Fund all of the money in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, not in excess of the principal of and interest on any bonds then due and payable, except as herein provided for the prior redemption of the bonds, and, if the money so returned on the remittance dates is less than the principal and interest then due and payable, the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned into the General Fund out of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 as soon as it shall become available, together with interest thereon
 from the dates of maturity until so returned at the same rate of interest as borne by the bonds, compounded semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.090.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for purposes of this article, a sum of money that will equal both of the following:

(a) That sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold as provided herein, as that principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) That sum necessary to carry out Section 998.091, appropriated without regard
 to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.091.

For purposes of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of a sum of money not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold pursuant to this article. Any sums withdrawn shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. All money made available under this article to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund from receipts from the sale of bonds sold under this
 article, together with interest at the rate of interest fixed in the bonds so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.092.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purposes of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board shall execute whatever documents are required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any
 amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.093.

Upon request of the board, supported by a statement of its plans and projects approved by the Governor, the committee shall determine whether to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry out the board’s plans and projects, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out these plans and projects progressively, and it is not necessary that all the bonds be issued or sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.094.

(a) So long as bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall, at the close of each fiscal year, require a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of each survey and
 projection shall be reported in writing by the public accountant to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and the committee.

(b) The
 Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the public accountant for these services out of
 money that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 92.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

998.095.

The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds authorized by this article at the time or times fixed by the Treasurer.

Whenever the committee deems it necessary for an effective sale of the bonds, the committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell any issue of bonds at less than their par value, notwithstanding Section 16754 of the Government Code. However, the discount on the bonds shall not exceed 3 percent of the par value
 thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.096.

Out of the first money realized from the sale of bonds as provided herein, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund, established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, the amount of all expenditures made for the purposes specified in that section, and this money may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional bond sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.097.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded by the issuance of refunding bonds in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Approval by the electors of the state for the issuance of bonds shall include the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5u. Veterans’ Bond Act of 1990 [998.098. - 998.112.]

998.098.

This article may be cited as the Veterans’ Bond Act of 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.099.

(a) The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” refer both to
 this article and that law.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Department of Veterans Affairs is designated the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.100.

As used herein, the following words have the following meanings:

(a) “Bond” means veterans’ bond, a state general obligation bond, issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991.

(c) “Board”
 means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, created by Section 988.

(e) “Bond act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting the State General Obligation Bond Law by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.101.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 (Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 987.50)), and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the committee may create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of not more than four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000), exclusive of refunding bonds, in the manner provided herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.102.

(a) All bonds authorized by this article, when duly sold and delivered as provided herein, constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

(b) There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected a sum of
 money, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, sufficient to pay the principal of, and interest on, these bonds as provided herein, and all officers required by law to perform any duty in regard to the collection of state revenues shall collect this additional sum.

(c) On the dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal of, and interest on, the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned to the General Fund all of the money in the fund, not in excess of the principal of, and interest on, any bonds then due and payable, except as herein provided for the prior redemption of the bonds. If the money so returned on the remittance dates is less than the principal and interest then due and payable, the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned to the General Fund out of the fund as soon as it shall become available, together with interest thereon
 from the dates of maturity until so returned, at the same rate of interest as borne by the bonds, compounded semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.103.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for purposes of this article, a sum of money that will equal both of the following:

(a) That sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold as provided herein, as that principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) That sum necessary to carry out Section 998.104, appropriated without regard
 to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.104.

For purposes of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of a sum of money not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold pursuant to this article. Any sums withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. All money made available under this section to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund, plus the interest that the amounts would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account,
 from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.105.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purposes of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board shall execute whatever documents are required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any
 amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.106.

Upon request of the board, supported by a statement of its plans and projects approved by the Governor, the committee shall determine whether to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry out the board’s plans and projects, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out these plans and projects progressively, and it is not necessary that all the bonds be issued or sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.107.

(a) So long as bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall, at the close of each fiscal year, require a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of each survey and
 projection shall be reported in writing by the public accountant to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and the committee.

(b) The
 Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the public accountant for these services out of
 money that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 93.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

998.108.

The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds authorized by this article at the time or times fixed by the Treasurer.

Whenever the committee deems it necessary for an effective sale of the bonds, the committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell any issue of bonds at less than their par value, notwithstanding Section 16754 of the Government Code. However, the discount on the bonds shall not exceed 3 percent of the par value
 thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.109.

Out of the first money realized from the sale of bonds as provided herein, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund, established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, the amount of all expenditures made for the purposes specified in that section, and this money may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional bond sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.110.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this article may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The approval of the voters for the issuance of bonds under this article includes approval for the issuance of bonds issued to refund bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.111.

Notwithstanding any provision of the bond act, if the Treasurer sells bonds under this article for which bond counsel has issued an opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excludable from gross income for purposes of federal income tax, subject to any conditions which may be designated, the Treasurer may establish separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the earnings on those proceeds, and may use those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required by
 federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or permitted under federal law necessary to maintain the tax-exempt status of the bonds or to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.112.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this article are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by Article XIIIB.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 142 at the November 6, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5v. Veterans’ Bond Act of 1996 [998.200. - 998.215.]

998.200.

This article may be cited as the Veterans’ Bond Act of 1996.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.201.

(a) The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to
 “herein” refer both to this article and that law.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Department of Veterans Affairs is designated the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.202.

As used herein, the following words have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(b) “Bond” means veterans’ bond, a state general obligation bond, issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(c) “Bond act” means this
 article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting the State General Obligation Bond Law by reference.

(d) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, established by Section 991.

(e) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, established by Section 988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.203.

For the purpose of establishing a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 (Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 987.50)), and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the committee may create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of not more than four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000), exclusive of refunding bonds, in the manner provided
 herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.204.

(a) All bonds authorized by this article, when duly sold and delivered as provided herein, constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

(b) There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue
 is collected a sum of money, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, sufficient to pay the principal of, and interest on, these bonds as provided herein, and all officers required by law to perform any duty in regard to the collection of state revenues shall collect this additional sum.

(c) On the dates on which funds are to be remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of debt service on the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be transferred to the General Fund to pay the debt service all of the money in the fund, not in excess of the amount of debt service then due and payable. If the money so transferred on the remittance dates is less than the debt service then due and payable, the balance remaining unpaid shall be transferred to the General Fund out of the fund as soon as it shall become available, together with interest thereon from the remittance date until paid, at the same rate of interest
 as borne by the bonds, compounded semiannually. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, this subdivision shall apply to all veterans farm and home purchase bond acts pursuant to this chapter. This subdivision does not grant any lien on the fund or the moneys therein to the holders of any bonds issued under this article. For the purposes of the subdivision, “debt service” means the principal (whether due at maturity, by redemption, or acceleration), premium, if any, or interest payable on any date with respect to any series of bonds. This subdivision shall not apply, however, in the case of any debt service that is payable from the proceeds of any refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.205.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for purposes of this article, a sum of money that will equal both of the following:

(a) That sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold as provided herein, as that principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) That sum necessary to carry out Section 998.206,
 appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.206.

For purposes of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of a sum of money not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold pursuant to this article. Any sums withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. All money made available under this section to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund, plus the interest that the amounts would have earned in the Pooled Money
 Investment Account, from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.207.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purposes of carrying out this article. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. The board shall execute whatever documents are required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and
 repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.208.

Upon request of the board, supported by a statement of its plans and projects approved by the Governor, the committee shall determine whether to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry out the board’s plans and projects, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out these plans and projects progressively, and it is not necessary that all the bonds be issued or sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.209.

(a) So long as bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall, at the close of each fiscal year, require a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of each survey and
 projection shall be reported in writing by the public accountant to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the California Veterans Board, and the committee.

(b) The Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the public accountant for these services out of
 money that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 94.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

998.210.

The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds authorized by this article at the time or times established by the Treasurer.

Whenever the committee deems it necessary for an effective sale of the bonds, the committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell any issue of bonds at less than their par value, notwithstanding Section 16754 of the Government Code. However, the discount on the bonds shall not exceed 3 percent of the par
 value thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.211.

Out of the first money realized from the sale of bonds as provided herein, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund, established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, the amount of all expenditures made for the purposes specified in that section, and this money may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional bond sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.212.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this article may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The approval of the voters for the issuance of bonds under this article includes approval for the issuance of bonds issued to refund bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.213.

Notwithstanding any provision of the bond act, if the Treasurer sells bonds under this article for which bond counsel has issued an opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excludable from gross income for purposes of federal income tax, subject to any conditions which may be designated, the Treasurer may establish separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the earnings on those proceeds, and may use those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other
 payment required by federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or permitted under federal law necessary to maintain the tax-exempt status of the bonds or to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.214.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this article are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by Article XIIIB.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.215.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any bonds issued and sold under the Veterans Bond Act of 1974, the Veterans Bond Act of 1976, the Veterans Bond Act of 1978, the Veterans Bond Act of 1980 or the Veterans Bond Act of 1986 may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, without regard to the first sentence of Section 16786 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 206 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5w. Veterans’ Bond Act of 2000 [998.300. - 998.315.]

998.300.

This article may be cited as the Veterans’ Bond Act of 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.301.

(a) The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All
 references in this article to “herein” refer both to this article and that law.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Department of Veterans Affairs is designated the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.302.

As used herein, the following words have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(b) “Bond” means veterans’ bond, a state general obligation bond, issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(c) “Bond act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting the State General Obligation Bond Law by reference.

(d) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, established by Section 991.

(e) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, established by Section 998.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.303.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 (Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 987.50)), and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the committee may create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of not more than five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000), exclusive of refunding bonds, in the
 manner provided herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.304.

(a) All bonds authorized by this article, when duly sold and delivered as provided herein, constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

(b) There shall be collected annually, in the same manner and at the same
 time as other state revenue is collected, a sum of money, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, sufficient to pay the principal of, and interest on, these bonds as provided herein, and all officers required by law to perform any duty in regard to the collection of state revenues shall collect this additional sum.

(c) On the dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal of, and interest on, the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned to the General Fund all of the money in the fund, not in excess of the principal of, and interest on, any bonds then due and payable. If the money so returned on the remittance dates is less than the principal and interest then due and payable, the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned to the General Fund out of the fund as soon as it shall become available, together with interest thereon from the dates
 of maturity until returned, at the same rate of interest as borne by the bonds, compounded semiannually. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, this subdivision shall apply to all veterans farm and home purchase contracts pursuant to this chapter. This subdivision does not grant any lien on the fund or the moneys therein to holders of any bonds issued under this article. For the purposes of the subdivision, “debt service” means the principal (whether due at maturity, by redemption, or acceleration), premium, if any, or interest payable on any date to any series of bonds. This subdivision shall not apply, however, in the case of any debt service that is payable from the proceeds of any refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.305.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for purposes of this article, a sum of money that will equal both of the following:

(a) That sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold as provided herein, as that principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) That sum necessary to carry
 out Section 998.306, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.306.

For the purposes of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of a sum of money not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold pursuant to this article. Any sums withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. All moneys made available under this section to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund, plus the interest that the amounts would
 have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.307.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purposes of carrying out this article. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. The board shall execute whatever documents are required by the Pooled Money
 Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.308.

Upon request of the board, supported by a statement of its plans and projects approved by the Governor, the committee shall determine whether to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry out the board’s plans and projects, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out these plans and projects progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds be issued or sold at
 any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.309.

As long as any bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall, at the close of each fiscal year, require a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of each survey and projection shall be reported in writing by the public accountant to the Secretary of
 Veterans Affairs, the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and the committee.

The Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the public accountant for these services out of any money which the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.310.

The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds authorized by this article at the time or times established by the Treasurer.

Whenever the committee deems it necessary for an effective sale of the bonds, the committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell any issue of bonds at less than their par value, notwithstanding Section 16754 of the Government Code. However, the discount on the bonds shall not
 exceed 3 percent of the par value thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 32 at the November 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.311.
